Nevada, session 83, SB415.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.473 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.473 1. As used in this section, “traffic violation” means
conviction of a moving traffic violation in any municipal court,
justice court or district court in this State or a finding by any
municipal court or justice court in this State that a person has
committed a civil infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive. The term includes a finding by a juvenile court
that a child has violated a traffic law or ordinance other than one
governing standing or parking. The term does not include [a] :
(a) A conviction or a finding by a juvenile court of a violation of
the speed limit posted by a public authority under the circumstances
described in subsection 1 of NRS 484B.617 [.] ; or
-
*SB415*

– 3 –
(b) A civil infraction citation issued for a violation detected by
an automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to section 2 of
this act.
2. The Department shall establish a uniform system of demerit
points for various traffic violations occurring within this State
affecting the driving privilege of any person who holds a driver’s
license issued by the Department and persons deemed to have future
driving privileges pursuant to NRS 483.447. The system must be
based on the accumulation of demerits during a period of 12
months.
3. The system must be uniform in its operation, and the
Department shall set up a schedule of demerits for each traffic
violation, depending upon the gravity of the violation, on a scale of
one demerit point for a minor violation of any traffic law to eight
demerit points for an extremely serious violation of the law
governing traffic violations. If a conviction of two or more traffic
violations committed on a single occasion is obtained, points must
be assessed for one offense or civil infraction, and if the point values
differ, points must be assessed for the offense or civil infraction
having the greater point value. Details of the violation must be
submitted to the Department by the court where the conviction or
finding is obtained. The Department may provide for a graduated
system of demerits within each category of violations according to
the extent to which the traffic law was violated.
Sec. 2. Chapter 484A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A governmental entity may authorize the installation and
use of an automated traffic enforcement system to enforce the
provisions of NRS 484B.300, 484B.307 and 484B.600, and any
corresponding traffic regulation, as provided in this section.
2. Before a governmental entity may authorize the
installation and use of an automated traffic enforcement system,
the governmental entity must make a finding that each location
selected for the use of the automated traffic enforcement system is
a location where:
(a) Traditional traffic enforcement methods have failed to
deter violations described in subsection 1;
(b) There is a high rate of violations described in subsection 1;
or
(c) There is a high rate of traffic crashes because of violations
described in subsection 1.
3. An automated traffic enforcement system may not be used
to enforce violations described in subsection 1 unless:
(a) The governmental entity that authorized the installation
and use of the automated traffic enforcement system provides for
-
*SB415*

– 4 –
or undertakes, not less than 30 days before any civil infraction
citation is issued for a violation described in subsection 1 which is
detected by the automated traffic enforcement system, a public
information campaign designed to inform persons of the presence
of the automated traffic enforcement system;
(b) The automated traffic enforcement system meets the
requirements for such a system set forth in regulations adopted by
the Department of Transportation; and
(c) There are warning signs installed not more than 300 feet
from the location of the automated traffic enforcement system.
The signs must meet the requirements for such signs set forth in
regulations adopted by the Department of Transportation.
4. Before a civil infraction citation is issued pursuant to NRS
484A.7035 for a violation described in subsection 1 which was
detected by an automated traffic enforcement system, the evidence
of the violation from the automated traffic enforcement system
must be reviewed for accuracy by a peace officer of a law
enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location of the
automated traffic enforcement system.
5. A civil infraction citation issued pursuant to NRS
484A.7035 for a violation described in subsection 1 which was
detected by an automated traffic enforcement system must be sent
by the law enforcement agency described in subsection 4 by first
class mail to the address listed with the Department for the
registered owner of the vehicle identified by the automated traffic
enforcement system.
6. In addition to the information required pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 484A.7035, a civil infraction citation issued
pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation described in subsection
1 which was detected by an automated traffic enforcement system
must include:
(a) The date and time of the violation;
(b) An image taken by the automated traffic enforcement
system showing the vehicle and vehicle license plate involved in
the violation or the address of the Internet website on which such
an image may be viewed; and
(c) A statement summarizing the provisions of subsection 7.
7. The registered owner of a vehicle is presumed to be the
driver of the vehicle at the time of a violation described in
subsection 1 which was detected by an automated traffic
enforcement system. Such a presumption may be rebutted if the
registered owner of the vehicle presents as evidence at a hearing
held pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 484A.704, an affidavit
stating:
-
*SB415*

– 5 –
(a) The name and address of the person having care, custody
and control of the vehicle at the time of the violation; or
(b) That the vehicle, at the time of the violation, was stolen.
Such an affidavit must be accompanied by evidence that supports
the affidavit, including, without limitation, a police report or an
insurance report.
8. If a civil infraction citation is issued pursuant to NRS
484A.7035 for a violation described in subsection 1 which was
detected by an automated traffic enforcement system, the
violation:
(a) Is not a moving traffic violation under NRS 483.473; and
(b) Is punishable by a civil penalty of not more than $100.
9. Any money collected as a civil penalty pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 8 must be accounted for separately in
the county or city treasury or State General Fund, as applicable, to
the law enforcement agency described in subsection 4 and used to
defray the cost of:
(a) Installing and operating an automated traffic enforcement
system, including, without limitation, the costs of administering
the provisions of this section; and
(b) Traffic safety programs, including, without limitation,
pedestrian safety programs, traffic enforcement and intersection
improvements related to traffic safety.
10. The provisions of this section do not prohibit a peace
officer from issuing a civil infraction citation for a violation of
any law of this State at the place where an automated traffic
enforcement system is installed and in use if the peace officer
witnesses a violation. A person who is given a civil infraction
citation by a peace officer pursuant to this subsection must not be
issued a civil infraction citation based on evidence from the
automated traffic enforcement system for the same violation for
which the peace officer issued the person the civil infraction
citation.
11. The Department of Transportation shall adopt
regulations setting forth requirements for an automated traffic
enforcement system. Such regulations must include, without
limitation:
(a) Standards for any photographic and other equipment used;
(b) The minimum yellow light duration required at an
intersection where an automated traffic enforcement system is
used to enforce the provisions of NRS 484B.600; and
(c) Standards for warning signs required by subsection 3.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Automated traffic enforcement system” means a
stationary electronic or digital system which creates a photograph
-
*SB415*

– 6 –
or other recorded image of a vehicle and a vehicle license plate
which is used as evidence of a violation of a traffic law by the
driver of the vehicle. Such a photograph or other recorded image
must not include any depiction of the driver of the vehicle.
(b) “Corresponding traffic regulation” means a traffic
regulation enacted by ordinance by the governing body of a city or
county pursuant to NRS 484A.400 that prohibits the same conduct
prohibited by NRS 484B.300, 484B.307 or 484B.600, respectively.
(c) “Governmental entity” means:
(1) The governing body of a city or county; or
(2) The Department of Public Safety.
Sec. 3. NRS 484A.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.600 [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 2 of
this act, a governmental entity and any agent thereof shall not use
photographic, video or digital equipment for gathering evidence to
be used for the issuance of a traffic citation or civil infraction
citation pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation of chapters
484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS unless the equipment is a portable
camera or event recording device worn or held by a peace officer,
the equipment is otherwise installed temporarily or permanently
within a vehicle or facility of a law enforcement agency or the
equipment is privately owned by a nongovernmental entity.
Sec. 4. NRS 484A.640 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.640 1. Except for a citation issued pursuant to NRS
484A.700 [,] or section 2 of this act, whenever a police officer
makes an arrest or issues a citation to a person for any violation of
chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS, the police officer shall
record the name as given by that person, the number of the person’s
driver’s license and a brief description of the person’s physical
appearance. This information must be maintained in a record for
offenses kept at the traffic enforcement agency which employs that
officer.
2. Whenever a police officer stops a driver of a motor vehicle
for any violation of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS and
requests information from a traffic enforcement agency concerning
that person’s record of prior offenses, the police officer shall
compare not only the driver’s name but also the number of his or her
driver’s license and physical description with any information
obtained from the agency as a result of the request. If the
information received from the agency indicates that the driver’s
name is on an outstanding warrant for a prior offense, the officer
shall not arrest the driver for that prior offense unless the additional
information used for comparison also connects the driver with that
prior offense.
-
*SB415*

– 7 –
Sec. 5. NRS 484A.704 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.704 1. Any person who receives a civil infraction
citation pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 or 484A.7049 or section 2 of
this act shall respond to the citation as provided in this section not
later than 90 calendar days after the date on which the citation is
issued.
2. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation does not
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond to the
citation by indicating that the person does not contest the
determination and submitting full payment of the monetary penalty,
the administrative assessment and any fees to the court specified in
the citation, or its traffic violations bureau, in person, by mail or
through the Internet or other electronic means.
3. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation wishes to
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond by
requesting in person, by mail or through the Internet or other
electronic means a hearing for that purpose. The court shall notify
the person in writing of the time, place and date of the hearing,
but the date of the hearing must not be earlier than 9 calendar days
after the court provides notice of the hearing.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, not less
than 30 days before the deadline for a person to respond to a civil
infraction citation, the court must send to the address or electronic
mail address of the person, as indicated on the civil infraction
citation issued to the person, a reminder that the person must
respond to the civil infraction citation within 90 calendar days after
the date on which the civil infraction citation is issued. If the person
agreed to receive communications relating to the civil infraction by
text message, the court may send such a notice to the telephone
number of the person as indicated on the civil infraction citation. If
the person does not respond to the civil infraction citation in the
manner specified by subsection 2 or 3 within 90 calendar days after
the date on which the civil infraction citation is issued, the court
must enter an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043 finding that the
person committed the civil infraction and assessing the monetary
penalty and administrative assessments prescribed for the civil
infraction. A person who has been issued a civil infraction citation
and who fails to respond to the civil infraction citation as required
by this section may not appeal an order entered pursuant to this
section.
5. If any person issued a civil infraction citation fails to appear
at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 3, the court must enter
an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043 finding that the person
-
*SB415*

– 8 –
committed the civil infraction and assessing the monetary penalty
and administrative assessments prescribed for the civil infraction. A
person who has been issued a civil infraction citation and who fails
to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 3 may not
appeal an order entered pursuant to this subsection.
6. In addition to any other penalty imposed, any person who is
found by the court to have committed a civil infraction pursuant to
subsection 5 shall pay the witness fees, per diem allowances, travel
expenses and other reimbursement in accordance with NRS 50.225.
7. If a court has established a system pursuant to NRS
484A.615, any person issued a civil infraction citation may, if
authorized by the court, use the system to perform any applicable
actions pursuant to this section.
Sec. 6. NRS 484A.7043 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.7043 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section [,]
and section 2 of this act, a person who is found to have committed a
civil infraction shall be punished by a civil penalty of not more than
$500 per violation unless a greater civil penalty is authorized by
specific statute. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484A.792 [,]
and section 2 of this act, any civil penalty collected pursuant to
NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, must be paid to:
(a) The treasurer of the city in which the civil infraction
occurred; or
(b) If the civil infraction did not occur in a city, the treasurer of
the county in which the civil infraction occurred.
2. If a person is found to have committed a civil infraction, in
addition to any civil penalty imposed on the person, the court shall
order the person to pay the administrative assessments set forth in
NRS 176.059, 176.0611, 176.0613 and 176.0623 in the amount that
the person would be required to pay if the civil penalty were a fine
imposed on a defendant who pleads guilty or guilty but mentally ill
or is found guilty or guilty but mentally ill of a misdemeanor. If, in
lieu of a civil penalty, the court authorizes a person to successfully
complete a course of traffic safety approved by the Department of
Motor Vehicles, the court must order the person to pay the amount
of the administrative assessment that corresponds to the civil penalty
for which the defendant would have otherwise been responsible.
The administrative assessments imposed pursuant to this subsection
must be collected and distributed in the same manner as the
administrative assessments imposed and collected pursuant to NRS
176.059, 176.0611, 176.0613 and 176.0623.
3. If the court determines that a civil penalty or administrative
assessment imposed pursuant to this section is:
-
*SB415*

– 9 –
(a) Excessive in relation to the financial resources of the
defendant, the court may waive or reduce the monetary penalty
accordingly.
(b) Not within the defendant’s present financial ability to pay,
the court may enter into a payment plan with the person.
4. A court having jurisdiction over a civil infraction pursuant to
NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, may:
(a) In addition to ordering a person who is found to have
committed a civil infraction to pay a civil penalty and administrative
assessments pursuant to this section, order the person to successfully
complete a course of traffic safety approved by the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(b) Waive or reduce the civil penalty that a person who is found
to have committed a civil infraction would otherwise be required to
pay if the court determines that any circumstances warrant such a
waiver or reduction.
(c) Reduce any moving violation for which a person was issued
a civil infraction citation to a nonmoving violation if the court
determines that any circumstances warrant such a reduction.
Sec. 7. NRS 408.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.581 1. The Advisory Committee on Traffic Safety is
hereby created in the Department. The Advisory Committee consists
of the following voting members:
(a) The Director of the Department of Transportation or his or
her designee;
(b) The Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services or his or her designee;
(c) The Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles or his or
her designee;
(d) The Director of the Department of Public Safety or his or her
designee;
(e) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her
designee;
(f) One member who is a representative of the Department of
Transportation, appointed by the Director of the Department of
Transportation;
(g) One member who is a representative of the Department of
Public Safety, appointed by the Director of the Department of Public
Safety;
(h) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly who
is a member of the Assembly Standing Committee on Growth and
Infrastructure during the current or immediately preceding regular
session;
(i) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate
who is a member of the Senate Standing Committee on Growth and
-
*SB415*

– 10 –
Infrastructure during the current or immediately preceding regular
session;
(j) One member who is a representative of the Administrative
Office of the Courts, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court of Nevada;
(k) One member who represents tribal governments in Nevada,
appointed by the Inter-Tribal Council of Nevada, Inc., or its
successor organization;
(l) Two members who are full- or part-time faculty members in
the Nevada System of Higher Education and have expertise in
traffic safety or trauma care, appointed by the Director of the
Department of Transportation;
(m) One member appointed by each metropolitan planning
organization to represent the appointing organization;
(n) One member appointed by the Nevada Association of
Counties;
(o) One member appointed by the Nevada League of Cities; and
(p) One member who represents local law enforcement agencies,
appointed by the Nevada Sheriffs’ and Chiefs’ Association.
2. The Director of the Department of Transportation may
appoint as nonvoting members of the Advisory Committee such
other persons as the Director deems appropriate.
3. The term of office of each member appointed to the
Advisory Committee is 2 years. Such members may be reappointed
for additional terms of 2 years in the same manner as the original
appointments. Any vacancy occurring in the appointed voting
membership of the Advisory Committee must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment not later than 30 days after the
vacancy occurs.
4. The members of the Advisory Committee shall elect from
their voting membership a Chair and a Vice Chair. The term of
office of the Chair and the Vice Chair is 2 years. If a vacancy occurs
in the office of Chair or Vice Chair, the members of the Advisory
Committee shall elect a Chair or Vice Chair, as applicable, from
among its voting members to serve for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
5. The Advisory Committee shall meet at least once each
calendar quarter and may meet at such further times as deemed
necessary by the Chair.
6. A majority of the voting members of the Advisory
Committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. If a
quorum is present, the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting
members of the Advisory Committee present is sufficient for any
official action taken by the Advisory Committee.
-
*SB415*

– 11 –
7. Each member of the Advisory Committee serves without
compensation and is not entitled to receive a per diem allowance or
travel expenses.
8. The Department shall provide administrative support to the
Advisory Committee.
9. The Advisory Committee shall review, study and make
recommendations regarding:
(a) Evidence-based best practices for reducing or preventing
deaths and injuries related to motor vehicle crashes on roadways in
this State;
(b) Data on motor vehicle crashes resulting in death or serious
bodily injury in this State, including, without limitation, factors that
cause such crashes and measures known to prevent such crashes;
(c) Policies intended to reduce or prevent deaths and injuries
related to motor vehicle crashes on roadways in this State; [and]
(d) Regulations proposed by the Department pursuant to
section 2 of this act; and
(e) Any other matter submitted by the Chair.
10. The Advisory Committee shall prepare and submit to the
Governor and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature an annual report concerning the
activities of the Advisory Committee that addresses, without
limitation, any issue reviewed or studied and any recommendations
made by the Advisory Committee pursuant to subsection 9.
11. The Advisory Committee may establish such working
groups, task forces and similar entities from within or outside its
membership as necessary to address specific issues or otherwise to
assist in its work.
12. As used in this section, “metropolitan planning
organization” means an entity that has been designated as a
metropolitan planning organization pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 134 and
49 U.S.C. § 5303.
Sec. 8. NRS 690B.028 is hereby amended to read as follows:
690B.028 An insurer shall not impose on an insured or group
of insured an increase in rates for motor vehicle insurance or cancel
or refuse to renew a policy of insurance because of [a] :
1. A conviction or a finding by a juvenile court of a violation of
the speed limit under the circumstances described in subsection 1 of
NRS 484B.617 [, nor shall an insurer cancel or refuse to renew a
policy of insurance for that reason.] ; or
2. A civil infraction citation received for a violation detected
by an automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to section 2
of this act.
Sec. 9. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
-
*SB415*

– 12 –
2. Sections 1 to 8, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB415*